Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1825
Authority; charge for services.

The authority may charge and collect rates, rents, fees, and other charges for the use of and for the services furnished or to be furnished by a project or any portion thereof and contract with any person, partnership, limited liability company, association, or corporation or other body public or private, except that the authority shall have no jurisdiction over rates, rents, fees, and charges established by an elementary or secondary school for its students other than to require that such rates, rents, fees, and charges by such school be sufficient to discharge such school's obligation to the authority.

Laws 1997, LB 809, § 25.